Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202571-3813
Processor; violation; false statement; perjury; forfeiture of certificate of registration.

(1) If a registered processor has been convicted by any court of a violation of the Kratom Consumer Protection Act, the processor may, in addition to the penalties for such offense, incur a forfeiture of the certificate of registration for its kratom products and all money that had been paid for such certificate of registration.

(2) If any materially false statement is made in any part of an application submitted under section 71-3807, the applicant shall be subject to prosecution for perjury and if convicted may, in addition to the penalties for such offense, incur a forfeiture of any certificate of registration that was issued for the applicant's kratom products and all money that had been paid for such certificate of registration.

Laws 2025, LB230, § 13.